Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-12,126
Sections, how construed.

Nothing in sections 25-12,124 to 25-12,126 shall be construed to supersede, abrogate, or limit any common-law remedies available to any injured person who has given a statement.

Laws 1988, LB 191, § 3.